src/twol-sme.txt
"Word Final Consonant Neutralization 2"
Cx:Cy <=> [ # | #: ] Cns:* (Vow:) Vow: Cns:+ Vow: j: _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ # | #: ] ; !háliid/háliit
            where Cx in (d)
                  Cy in (t) ;


"Deletion: Final h s j ž in Contracted Stems"
Cx:0 <=> Vow _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ Y5: | Y6: j: ] ; !1.138
!Cx:0 <=> Vow _ [ Y5: | Y6: j: ] ( [ Hyph | #: ] ) ;
!Cx:0 <=> Vow _ [ Y5: | Y6: j: ]   [ Hyph | #: | Cns: ];
			where Cx in (h s j ž) ;
! Debugging, 142 for reference.
! Changed because:-

!€ fijdnisY5t
!€ fiidná00t

!$ fijdnisY5t
!$ fiidnás0t

!$ fijdnisY5t
!$ fiidnis0t

!€ albmájY5
!€ albmá00

!€ olbmožY5
!€ olbmo00

!€ fijdnisY5t-
!€ fiidná00t-

!€ albmájY5-
!€ albmá00-

!€ olbmožY5-
!€ olbmo00-



"Word Final Cluster Simplification 1"
  Cy:0 <=> Vow Cx _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) (Hyph) [ # | #: ]  ;
	where Cx in (l r)
	      Cy in (d g) ;
!€ vuordild#
!€ vuordil00

!$ vuordild#
!$ vuordild0

"Word Final Cluster Simplification 2"                 ! attestit : attes
  Cx:0 <=> Vow ( %>: ) ( »: ) (W4:) s _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) (Hyph) [ # | #: ]  ;
			where Cx in (t k m) ;
!€ attest#
!€ attes00

!$ attest#
!$ attest0

"Word Final Cluster Simplification 3"                 ! beroštit : beroš
  t:0 <=> Vow š _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) (Hyph) [ # | #: ]  ;
!€ berošt#
!€ beroš00

"Word Final Cluster Simplification 4"                 ! bearjadahka : bearjadat
  Cx:0 <=> Vow h: ':0 _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) (Hyph) [ # | #: ]  ;
			where Cx in (t k) ;
! Changing bearjadahk to bearjadah'k, adding ':0

!€ bearjadah'k#
!€ bearjadat000

!$ bearjadah'k#
!$ bearjadat0k0

!$ bearjadah'k#
!$ bearjadat'00

!$ bearjadah'k#
!$ bearjadah000

!$ bearjadah'k#
!$ bearjadat'k0

!$ bearjadah'k#
!$ bearjadah0k0

!$ bearjadah'k#
!$ bearjadah'k0


!"Word Final Cluster Simplification 5"                 ! bearjadahka : bearjadat
!  h:t <=> Vow _ ':0 [t:0 | k:0] (Hyph) #:  ;
! Splitting WFCF 4 into 2 to handle the inserted ':0 symbol.
! But this seems already covered by "Word Final Consonant Neutralization 1"


"Word Final Double Consonant Simplification"          ! muitaluss : muitalus
  Cy:0 <=> Vow Cx: _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) (Hyph) [ # | #: ]  ;
			where Cx in (s š d ž)
				Cy in (s š d ž)
			matched ;
!€ muitaluss#
!€ muitalus00

!$ vejolažž#
!$ vejolažž0

!€ vejolažž#
!€ vejolaš00




! Consonant gradation rules
! -------------------------


!Now that long double cons. have been analyzed having lexical triple consonants,
!many of the grad. rules of the form ':Cx may be collapsed to a single rule
!without left context: _ Cx Vow: WeG: ; where XXXX matched ; . This has not
!been done yet (PS 29.11.1993).
! But the long double cons have not been analyzed as triple consonants!

"Gradation: h Loss"                                    ! johka : joga (h:0)
  h:0 <=> _ ': Cy: ( %>: ) ( »: ) Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cy in (p t k c č) ;
!€ joh'kaX4
!€ jo00ga0

!$ joh'kaX4 joh'kaX4 joh'kaX4 joh'kaX4 joh'kaX4 jo0'kaX4
!$ joh0ga0  jo0'ga0  jo00ka0  joh'ga0  joh0ka0  joh0ga0


"Gradation: Prenasal Stops"                           ! sápmi : sámi (p:0)
  Cx:0 <=> _ Cy Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (p t k)
			      Cy in (m n ŋ)
			matched ;
!€ sápmiX4
!€ sá0mi0

!$ sápmiX4
!$ sápmi0


"Gradation: tnj"                                       ! latnja : lanja (t:0)
  t:0 <=> _ n j Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
!€ latnjaX4
!€ la0nja0

"Gradation: dj"                                        ! vuodjit:vuoján
  d:0 <=> Vow: _ ': j Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
!€ vuod'jiQ4n
!€ vuo00já0n

"Gradation: Double Consonant"                          ! káffe:káfes
  Cx:0 <=> Vow: _ Cy ( %>: ) ( »: ) Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (đ f l m n ŋ r s š ŧ v)
			      Cy in (đ f l m n ŋ r s š ŧ v)
			matched ;
!€ káffeX4s
!€ ká0fe0s


! Note: I added a t rule, due to substandard Ruotta:Ruotas
"Gradation: Double t"
  t:0 <=> u o _ t a: ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
!€ RuottaX4s
!€ Ruo0ta0s


!"Gradation: šž"  !Commented out because it causes wordforms like *muitalepmožis. Instead we now have !this in lexicon:
!nju0nuš:njunnuš MALIS ;
!nju0nuš:njunnuž MALIS ; !SUB
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: _ X2: Vow ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) ;	! njunnoša:njunnožis
!  Cx:Cy => Vow: _ X2: Vow ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) ;	! njunnoša:njunnožis
!		    where Cx in (š)
!		          Cy in (ž)
!			matched ;
!!€ njunnošX2a
!!€ njunnož0a


"Gradation: Preaspirated Geminates"                    ! áhkku:áhkus
  Cx:0 <=> h _ Cy Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (k p t c č l r)
			      Cy in (k p t c č l r)
			matched ;
!€ áhkkuX4s
!€ áh0ku0s

"Gradation: Jodded Double Consonants"                       ! viellja:vieljas
  Cx:0 <=> Vow: _ Cy j Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;    ! mannji:manjis
			where Cx in (l d n)                 ! áddjá:ádjás
			      Cy in (l d n)
			matched ;
!€ vielljaX4
!€ vie0lja0

!€ mannjiX4
!€ ma0nji0

!€ áddjáX4
!€ á0djá0

"Gradation: Cluster Non-nasal Sonorant + Non-sonorant"      ! láj'bi:láibbi
  ':Cx <=> Vow: [ g | l | r | đ | v | j: ] _ Cz Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (f g d b k p t z ž c č s š)
			      Cz in (f g d b k p t z ž c č s š)
			matched ;
! Added (¤:), evaluate! XXX. (Removed it since it caused CG in some PrsPrc.TO)
!€ láj'biX4
!€ láibbi0

"Gradation: Cluster ŋ + Non-sonorant"                      ! seaŋ'ga:seaŋgga
  ':Cx <=> Vow: ŋ _ Cz Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;   ! boŋ'kit:boŋkkii
			where Cx in ( g k )
			      Cz in ( g k )
			matched ;
!€ seaŋ'gaX4
!€ seaŋgga0

!€ boŋ'kiX4j#
!€ boŋkki0i0

"Gradation: Cluster ft:ftt"                      ! sáf'ta:sáftta
  ':t <=> Vow: f _ t Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;

!€ sáf'taX4
!€ sáftta0

"Gradation: Cluster bn:bnn"			! oab'na:oabnna
  ':n <=> Vow: b _ n Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;

!€ oab'naX4
!€ oabnna0

"Gradation: Cluster m + Non-sonorant"                       ! lám'pa:lámppas
  ':Cx <=> Vow: m _ Cz Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;    ! rán'ska:ránskkas
			where Cx in (f b p s š t)
			      Cz in (f b p s š t)
			matched ;
! mt : mtt added bec. of ámta:ámttas, although not in grammar. Check norm!
!€ ám'taX4
!€ ámtta0

! This rule only applies to lexical entries written with non-standard n.
! The rule itself is ok, and requried for proper gradation of the lexical
! entries. Thus, the rule is not in itself !SUB, but the entries in the
! lexicon are, and should be marked accordingly.
"Gradation: Cluster n + Non-sonorant"                      ! In'gá:Inggás
  ':Cx <=> Vow: n _ Cz Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in ( g k )
			      Cz in ( g k )
			matched ;
!€ In'gáX4
!€ Inggá0
! The proper way of writing is Iŋgá/Iŋggás. We add a substandard pattern with n here,
! as we have seen it in use (56 Ingá, 18 Inggá!).


"Gradation: Cluster n + Non-sonorant"                       ! gán'da:gánddat
  ':Cx <=> Vow: n _ Cz Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (d t z ž c č s š)
			      Cz in (d t z ž c č s š)
			matched ;
!€ gán'daX4
!€ gándda0


"Gradation: Cluster p + t"                                  ! konseap'ta:konseapttat
  ':t <=> Vow: p _ t Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
! Added because of this word. The pattern is not in the grammar.
!€ konseap'taX4
!€ konseaptta0


"Gradation: Cluster j/v + Liquid"                           ! áj'ru:áirrut
  ':Cx <=> Vow: [ j: | v ] _ Cz Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (l r)
			      Cz in (l r)
			matched ;
!€ áj'ruX4
!€ áirru0

!€ biev'laX4
!€ bievlla0

"Gradation: Cluster r + l"                           ! áj'ru:áirrut
  ':l <=> Vow: r _ l Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;

!€ jar'laX4
!€ jarlla0


"Gradation: Clusters lv, rj etc."                           ! ol'ju:oljjus
  ':Cx <=> Vow: [ đ | l | r | n ] _ Cz Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (v j)
			      Cz in (v j)
			matched ;
!€ ol'juX4
!€ oljju0


"Gradation: Clusters tk, tm"                                ! mát'ki:mátkkis
  ':Cx <=> Vow: [ t | ŧ ] _ Cy Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (k m)
			      Cy in (k m)
			matched ;
! ŧ is missing in the grammar. example?
!€ mát'kiX4
!€ mátkki0


"Gradation: Clusters ts, ks"                               !
  0:s <=> Vow: [ t | k ] _ s Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
! I cannot find any such clusters.

"Gradation: Clusters sk, sm etc."                          ! beas'ka:beaskka
  ':Cx <=> Vow: [ s | š ] _ Cz: Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (b k p t l m v)
			      Cz in (b k p t l m v)
			matched ;
!€ beas'kaX4
!€ beaskka0


"Gradation: Cluster vj"                                    ! čoav'ji:čoavjji
  ':j <=> Vow: v _ j Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
!€ čoav'jiX4
!€ čoavjji0


"Gradation: Cluster jv"                                    ! beaj'vi:beaivvit
  ':v <=> Vow: j: _ v Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
!€ beaj'viX4
!€ beaivvi0

"Gradation: ihm, vhl etc."                                 ! dujh'mi:duihmmit
  ':Cx <=> Vow: [ j: | v ] h _ Cy Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (l m n)
			      Cy in (l m n)
			matched ;
!€ dujh'miX4
!€ duihmmi0


"Gradation: Clusters lbm, jdn, vdn etc."                   ! čuolbma:čuolmma
  Cx:Cy <=> [ l | j: | v | đ ] _ Cz Vow (Cns) ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (b d g )
			      Cy in (m n ŋ)
			      Cz in (m n ŋ)
			matched ;
!€ čuolbmaX4
!€ čuolmma0

"Gradation: Clusters lm, jn, vn etc."                   ! Dálma:Dálmma
  ':Cx <=> [ l | j: | v ] _ Cy Vow (Cns) ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (m n)
			      Cy in (m n)
			matched ;
!€ DálmaX4
!€ Dálmma0


! "(Cns)" is added. I do not like it. But the rule as it was blocked the
! "olmmožin" essive of "olmmoš", since the "ž" was neither an underlying
! nor a surface stem consonant, I had to do something. The rule as it stands
! is meaningless, "(Cns)" contains both (StemCns:) and (:StemCns).
! Think through this.


"Gradation: Clusters ldnj, vdnj etc."                      ! sávdnji:sávnnji
  d:n <=> [ l | v ] _ n j Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
!€ sávdnjiX4
!€ sávnnji0


"Gradation: Clusters rbm, rdn rgŋ"                        ! čorbma:čorpma
  Cx:Cy <=> r _ Cz Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (b d g)
			      Cy in (p t k)
			      Cz in (m n ŋ)
			matched ;
!€ čorbmaX4
!€ čorpma0


"Gradation: Clusters rdnj"                                 ! skurdnji:skurtnji
  Cx:Cy <=> r _ Cz j Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (b d g)
			      Cy in (p t k)
			      Cz in (m n ŋ)
			matched ;
!€ skurdnjiX4
!€ skurtnji0


"Gradation: ist, vsk etc."                                 ! návs'tu:návsttu
  ':Cx <=> Vow: [ j: | v | l | r | m | n ] s _
                Cy Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (k t)
			      Cy in (k t)
			matched ;
!€ návs'tuX4
!€ návsttu0


"Gradation: mšk, ršk"                                    ! limš'ki:limškki
  ':k <=> Vow: [ m | r ] š _ k Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
!€ limš'kiX4
!€ limškki0


"Gradation: Clusters kc ks etc. 1"                         ! uk'sa:uvssa
  k:v <=> Vow: _ ': Cx Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (t c č s š) ;
!€ uk'saX4
!€ uvssa0


"Gradation: Clusters kc ks etc. 2"                         ! uk'sa:uvssa
  ':Cx <=> Vow: k: _ Cy Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (t c č s š)
			      Cy in (t c č s š)
			matched ;

"Gradation: Cluster kst 1"                                 ! teaks'ta:teavstta
  k:v <=> Vow: _ s ': t Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
!€ teaks'taX4
!€ teavstta0
